New York, session 2025-2026, A5218.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 195.02 of the penal law, as added by chapter 242 of 2 the laws of 2015, is amended to read as follows: 3 § 195.02 Concealment and/or mutilation of a human corpse. 4 A person is guilty of concealment and/or mutilation of a human corpse 5 when[, having a reasonable expectation that a human corpse or a part 6 thereof will be produced for or used as physical evidence in: (a) an 7 official proceeding; (b) an autopsy as part of a criminal investigation; 8 or (c) an examination by law enforcement personnel as part of a criminal 9 investigation;] such person, alone or in concert with another, conceals, 10 alters, mutilates and/or destroys such corpse or part thereof [with the 11 intent to prevent its production, use or discovery]. The provisions of 12 this section shall not apply to an individual or entity authorized to 13 accept an anatomical gift pursuant to section forty-three hundred two of 14 the public health law or to the lawful activities of a funeral director, 15 undertaker or embalmer under article thirty-four of the public health 16 law. 17 Concealment and/or mutilation of a human corpse is a class E felony. 18 § 2. Paragraphs (t) and (u) of subdivision 4 of section 510.10 of the 19 criminal procedure law, paragraph (t) as amended and paragraph (u) as 20 added by section 2 of subpart B of part UU of chapter 56 of the laws of 21 2022, are amended and a new paragraph (v) is added to read as follows: 22 (t) any felony or class A misdemeanor involving harm to an identifi- 23 able person or property, or any charge of criminal possession of a EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02153-01-5 A. 5218 2 1 firearm as defined in section 265.01-b of the penal law, where such 2 charge arose from conduct occurring while the defendant was released on 3 [his or her] such defendant's own recognizance, released under condi- 4 tions, or had yet to be arraigned after the issuance of a desk appear- 5 ance ticket for a separate felony or class A misdemeanor involving harm 6 to an identifiable person or property, or any charge of criminal 7 possession of a firearm as defined in section 265.01-b of the penal law, 8 provided, however, that the prosecutor must show reasonable cause to 9 believe that the defendant committed the instant crime and any underly- 10 ing crime. For the purposes of this subparagraph, any of the underlying 11 crimes need not be a qualifying offense as defined in this subdivision. 12 For the purposes of this paragraph, "harm to an identifiable person or 13 property" shall include but not be limited to theft of or damage to 14 property. However, based upon a review of the facts alleged in the accu- 15 satory instrument, if the court determines that such theft is negligible 16 and does not appear to be in furtherance of other criminal activity, the 17 principal shall be released on [his or her] such principal's own recog- 18 nizance or under appropriate non-monetary conditions; [or] 19 (u) criminal possession of a weapon in the third degree as defined in 20 subdivision three of section 265.02 of the penal law or criminal sale of 21 a firearm to a minor as defined in section 265.16 of the penal law[.]; 22 or 23 (v) the concealment and/or mutilation of a human corpse pursuant to 24 section 195.02 of the penal law. 25 § 3. Subparagraphs (xx) and (xxi) of paragraph (b) of subdivision 1 of 26 section 530.20 of the criminal procedure law, subparagraph (xx) as 27 amended and subparagraph (xxi) as added by section 4 of subpart C of 28 part UU of chapter 56 of the laws of 2022, are amended and a new subpar- 29 agraph (xxii) is added to read as follows: 30 (xx) any felony or class A misdemeanor involving harm to an identifi- 31 able person or property, or any charge of criminal possession of a 32 firearm as defined in section 265.01-b of the penal law where such 33 charge arose from conduct occurring while the defendant was released on 34 [his or her] such defendant's own recognizance, released under condi- 35 tions, or had yet to be arraigned after the issuance of a desk appear- 36 ance ticket for a separate felony or class A misdemeanor involving harm 37 to an identifiable person or property, provided, however, that the 38 prosecutor must show reasonable cause to believe that the defendant 39 committed the instant crime and any underlying crime. For the purposes 40 of this subparagraph, any of the underlying crimes need not be a quali- 41 fying offense as defined in this subdivision. For the purposes of this 42 paragraph, "harm to an identifiable person or property" shall include 43 but not be limited to theft of or damage to property. However, based 44 upon a review of the facts alleged in the accusatory instrument, if the 45 court determines that such theft is negligible and does not appear to be 46 in furtherance of other criminal activity, the principal shall be 47 released on [his or her] such principal's own recognizance or under 48 appropriate non-monetary conditions; [or] 49 (xxi) criminal possession of a weapon in the third degree as defined 50 in subdivision three of section 265.02 of the penal law or criminal sale 51 of a firearm to a minor as defined in section 265.16 of the penal 52 law[.]; or 53 (xxii) the concealment and/or mutilation of a human corpse pursuant 54 to section 195.02 of the penal law. 55 § 4. Paragraphs (t) and (u) of subdivision 4 of section 530.40 of the 56 criminal procedure law, paragraph (t) as amended and paragraph (u) as A. 5218 3 1 added by section 4 of subpart B of part UU of chapter 56 of the laws of 2 2022, are amended and a new paragraph (v) is added to read as follows: 3 (t) any felony or class A misdemeanor involving harm to an identifi- 4 able person or property, or any charge of criminal possession of a 5 firearm as defined in section 265.01-b of the penal law, where such 6 charge arose from conduct occurring while the defendant was released on 7 [his or her] such defendant's own recognizance, released under condi- 8 tions, or had yet to be arraigned after the issuance of a desk appear- 9 ance ticket for a separate felony or class A misdemeanor involving harm 10 to an identifiable person or property, or any charge of criminal 11 possession of a firearm as defined in section 265.01-b of the penal law, 12 provided, however, that the prosecutor must show reasonable cause to 13 believe that the defendant committed the instant crime and any underly- 14 ing crime. For the purposes of this subparagraph, any of the underlying 15 crimes need not be a qualifying offense as defined in this subdivision. 16 For the purposes of this paragraph, "harm to an identifiable person or 17 property" shall include but not be limited to theft of or damage to 18 property. However, based upon a review of the facts alleged in the accu- 19 satory instrument, if the court determines that such theft is negligible 20 and does not appear to be in furtherance of other criminal activity, the 21 principal shall be released on [his or her] such principal's own recog- 22 nizance or under appropriate non-monetary conditions; [or] 23 (u) criminal possession of a weapon in the third degree as defined in 24 subdivision three of section 265.02 of the penal law or criminal sale of 25 a firearm to a minor as defined in section 265.16 of the penal law[.]; 26 or 27 (v) the concealment and/or mutilation of a human corpse pursuant to 28 section 195.02 of the penal law. 29 § 5. This act shall take effect immediately.